Utah statutes.
31A-37-203.   Deceptive name prohibited.
A captive insurance company may not adopt a name that is:
(1)  the same as any other existing business name registered in this state;
(2)  deceptively similar to any other existing business name registered in
this state; or
(3)  likely to be:
(a)  confused with any other existing business name registered in this state;
or
(b)  mistaken for any other existing business name registered in this state.
